Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2512
Occupational therapy assistant, defined.

Occupational therapy assistant means a person licensed to assist in the practice of occupational therapy under the Occupational Therapy Practice Act and who works under the appropriate supervision of, and in collaboration with, an occupational therapist.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 852;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 9.